apertium-srn.srn.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

  <!-- Define the alphabet below. -->
  <alphabet>aAáÁăảạÆbBcCčdDÐeEéèễệfFgGhHiIíjJkKlLmMnNoOóöớpPqQrRsSšştTŢuUúüưvVwWxXyYzZ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <!-- Define symbol definitions within <sdef> here. -->
    <sdef n="n"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>

    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="det"   c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"     c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"     c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"     c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="aux"     c="Auxiliary"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"     c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"     c="Conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="ij"     c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Number"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
<sdef n="p2"/>
      <sdef n="p3"/>
      <sdef n="subj"/>
      <sdef n="obj"/>
<sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
<sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
<sdef n="vbmod"     c="Vb. mod"/>
<sdef n="nt"     c="nt"/>

  </sdefs>
    

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Define paradigms within <pardef> here. -->
    <pardef n="pikin__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="John__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="soigi__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="na__vbser">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="fu__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="efu__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="pe__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="ben__aux">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="aux"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="sensi__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="langi__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="nanga__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="kokodiako__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="san__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="tu__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="wan__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="misrefi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="yusrefi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="ensrefi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="wisrefi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="unusrefi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="densrefi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="noti__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="wan sani__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="ai__cont">
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/>+e<s n="sg"/><s n="aux"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="musu__vbmod">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="a_trawan__prn">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>den</l>         <r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="PRPERS__prn">
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>mi</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>mi</l><r>prpers<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yu</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>yu</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>yu</l><r>prpers<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>en</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>en</l><r>prpers<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wi</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>wi</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unu</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>unu</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>un</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e r="LR"><p><l>un</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>den</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>den</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__det">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>den</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="wan__det">
    <e><p><l>wan</l><r>wan<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="ala__det">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="na__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="na__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="ben"><i>ben</i><par n="ben__aux"/></e>
    <e lm="prpers"><i></i><par n="PRPERS__prn"/></e>
      <e lm="a"><i></i><par n="a__det"/></e>
      <e lm="nanga"><i>nanga</i><par n="fu__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="sensi"><i>sensi</i><par n="sensi__cnjsub"/></e>
      <e lm="ai" r="LR"><i></i><par n="ai__cont"/></e>
      <e lm="wan"><i></i><par n="wan__det"/></e>
    <e lm="John"><i>John</i><par n="John__np"/></e>
<e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="a__det"/></e>
<e lm="abrasei fu"><i>abrasei fu</i><par n="fu__pr"/></e>
<e lm="afen"><i>afen</i><par n="kokodiako__ij"/></e>
<e lm="aititenti"><i>aititenti</i><par n="tu__num"/></e>
<e lm="ala"><i>ala</i><par n="ala__det"/></e>
<e lm="alape"><i>alape</i><par n="efu__adv"/></e>
<e lm="angri"><i>angri</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
<e lm="awinsi fa"><i>awinsi fa</i><par n="sensi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="awinsi"><i>awinsi</i><par n="sensi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="baka di"><i>baka di</i><par n="nanga__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="baya"><i>baya</i><par n="kokodiako__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ben"><i>ben</i><par n="ben__aux"/></e>
<e lm="bigi"><i>bigi</i><par n="langi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bika"><i>bika</i><par n="nanga__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="bo"><i>bo</i><par n="musu__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="boktu"><i>boktu</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
<e lm="botro"><i>botro</i><par n="soigi__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="da"><i>da</i><par n="a__det"/></e>
<e lm="dalèk"><i>dalèk</i><par n="efu__adv"/></e>
<e lm="dangra"><i>dangra</i><par n="langi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dat'ede"><i>dat'ede</i><par n="nanga__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="den"><i>den</i><par n="a__det"/></e>
<e lm="didibri"><i>didibri</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
<e lm="dri"><i>dri</i><par n="tu__num"/></e>
<e lm="dropu kon in'sei"><i>dropu kon in'sei</i><par n="soigi__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dusun"><i>dusun</i><par n="tu__num"/></e>
<e lm="dya"><i>dya</i><par n="efu__adv"/></e>
<e lm="dyomp'ati"><i>dyomp'ati</i><par n="langi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="ben__aux"/></e>
<e lm="ei"><i>ei</i><par n="kokodiako__ij"/></e>
<e lm="esko"><i>esko</i><par n="nanga__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ete"><i>ete</i><par n="efu__adv"/></e>
<e lm="fa"><i>fa</i><par n="sensi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="fayawatra"><i>fayawatra</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
<e lm="feifi"><i>feifi</i><par n="tu__num"/></e>
<e lm="frekti"><i>frekti</i><par n="langi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fringi"><i>fringi</i><par n="soigi__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fu sanede meki"><i>fu sanede meki</i><par n="nanga__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="fu"><i>fu</i><par n="fu__pr"/></e>
<e lm="gaw"><i>gaw</i><par n="efu__adv"/></e>
<e lm="gotromotyo"><i>gotromotyo</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
<e lm="hondro"><i>hondro</i><par n="tu__num"/></e>
<e lm="ingi"><i>ingi</i><par n="langi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ini"><i>ini</i><par n="fu__pr"/></e>
<e lm="kan"><i>kan</i><par n="musu__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="kapu"><i>kapu</i><par n="soigi__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kersi"><i>kersi</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
<e lm="kokodiako"><i>kokodiako</i><par n="kokodiako__ij"/></e>
<e lm="kroru"><i>kroru</i><par n="langi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="krosbei"><i>krosbei</i><par n="efu__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kuku"><i>kuku</i><par n="soigi__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="leki"><i>leki</i><par n="sensi__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="lontu"><i>lontu</i><par n="fu__pr"/></e>
<e lm="lowe nengre"><i>lowe nengre</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
<e lm="man"><i>man</i><par n="musu__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="mangrimangri"><i>mangrimangri</i><par n="langi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="misrefi"><i>misrefi</i><par n="misrefi__prn"/></e>
<e lm="moimoi"><i>moimoi</i><par n="soigi__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mu"><i>mu</i><par n="musu__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="mus"><i>mus</i><par n="musu__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="musu"><i>musu</i><par n="musu__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="na di"><i>na di</i><par n="nanga__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="a__det"/></e>
<e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="fu__pr"/></e>
<e lm="nanga"><i>nanga</i><par n="fu__pr"/></e>
<e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="kokodiako__ij"/></e>
<e lm="noti"><i>noti</i><par n="noti__prn"/></e>
<e lm="not'noti"><i>not'noti</i><par n="noti__prn"/></e>
<e lm="nownow"><i>nownow</i><par n="efu__adv"/></e>
<e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="musu__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="kokodiako__ij"/></e>
<e lm="oten"><i>oten</i><par n="nanga__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="pardon"><i>pardon</i><par n="kokodiako__ij"/></e>
<e lm="pe"><i>pe</i><par n="pe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="peni"><i>peni</i><par n="langi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pipa"><i>pipa</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
<e lm="prefuru"><i>prefuru</i><par n="soigi__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="psa"><i>psa</i><par n="fu__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sa"><i>sa</i><par n="musu__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="san"><i>san</i><par n="san__prn"/></e>
<e lm="seibi"><i>seibi</i><par n="tu__num"/></e>
<e lm="smèlter"><i>smèlter</i><par n="soigi__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="nanga__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="son leisi"><i>son leisi</i><par n="efu__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sterapra"><i>sterapra</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
<e lm="tai"><i>tai</i><par n="langi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="taki"><i>taki</i><par n="nanga__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="fu__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tin-na-aiti"><i>tin-na-aiti</i><par n="tu__num"/></e>
<e lm="tin-na-neigi"><i>tin-na-neigi</i><par n="tu__num"/></e>
<e lm="toku"><i>toku</i><par n="efu__adv"/></e>
<e lm="a trawan"><i></i><par n="a_trawan__prn"/><p><l><b/>trawan</l><r><g><b/>trawan</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="tutenti"><i>tutenti</i><par n="tu__num"/></e>
<e lm="urei"><i>urei</i><par n="kokodiako__ij"/></e>
<e lm="wan sani"><i>wan sani</i><par n="wan sani__prn"/></e>
<e lm="wan"><i>wan</i><par n="wan__det"/></e>
<e lm="wan"><i>wan</i><par n="wan__num"/></e>
<e lm="wani"><i>wani</i><par n="musu__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="we"><i>we</i><par n="kokodiako__ij"/></e>
<e lm="wroko skin"><i>wroko skin</i><par n="soigi__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="yesidoti"><i>yesidoti</i><par n="pikin__n"/></e>
